Utah statutes.
10-8-4.   Special taxes and licenses.
(1)  Municipal legislative bodies may:
(a)  subject to Subsection (2), fix the amount, terms, and manner of issuing
licenses; and
(b)  consistent with general law, provide the manner and form in which special
taxes are levied and collected.
(2) (a)  Municipal legislative bodies may not discriminate between resident
community businesses and nonresident community businesses in establishing
license requirements.
(b)  Municipal legislative bodies may not impose motor vehicle delivery
license fees on persons or entities who:
(i)  are licensed as dealers in another municipality; or
(ii)  do not have a permanent business location in the municipality.
